Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Article 2. Creation of Districts.

§ 21-228.
Territory which may be embraced in district.

Any integral body of territory within which are situated rivers, creeks or other watercourses or streams, not affected by ebb and flow of the tide, and none of which are embraced within any other sanitation district may, under the conditions and upon the taking and completion of the proceedings provided in this article, be created a sanitation district. Every part of the boundary of such a sanitation district shall either (1) coincide with the boundary of a county, city or town or (2) bisect a county, city or town, or (3) be located within one mile of the boundary of a county, city or town, or (4) consist of a straight line connecting two points each of which lies upon a boundary of one of the three types hereinabove described.

History.

1946, p. 348; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii3.

§ 21-229.
Notice of hearing on petition for creation.

Upon the presentation of a petition complying with the requirements of this article, praying for the creation of a sanitation district, fixing the boundaries thereof and naming the counties, cities and towns which in whole or in part are to be embraced therein, the circuit court of any such county, or of any county in which any such town is situated, or the corporation court of any such city shall make an order filing such petition and fixing a day for a hearing by such court on such petition and the question of the creation of the proposed sanitation district. Such order shall direct notice of such hearing to be given by publication once a week for at least three consecutive weeks beginning at least twenty-eight days prior to the day of such hearing in some newspaper or newspapers, named in such order, having general circulation in the proposed sanitation district. Such notice shall set forth the petition as filed, but need not set forth the signatures or exhibits thereto, and shall state the time and place of hearing and that at such hearing all persons desiring to controvert the allegations of such petition or question the conformity thereof to this article will be heard and all objections to the creation of the proposed sanitation district considered.

History.

1946, p. 348; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii3.

§ 21-230.
Contents of petition.

Every such petition shall pray for the creation of the proposed sanitation district, and set forth the name of the proposed sanitation district (which shall include the words “sanitation district”), shall fix the boundaries thereof, shall name the cities and counties and towns which are in whole or in part to be embraced therein and shall contain an allegation (1) that the proposed sanitation district includes within its territorial limits watercourses or streams which are polluted, (2) that no part of the proposed sanitation district is within the territorial limits of an existing sanitation district, (3) that the proposed sanitation district is an integral whole and does not completely surround any territory not included in the proposed or some existing sanitation district, (4) that the creation of the proposed sanitation district in accordance with this chapter will provide a means for abating or preventing the pollution of waters of the proposed sanitation district and will benefit all the property within the proposed sanitation district, (5) that the creation of the proposed sanitation district has been approved by the State Health Commissioner as providing a practical means for abating or preventing the pollution of the waters of the proposed sanitation district, (6) that the petition has been approved and the prayer thereof joined in by each city, county and town which is in whole or in part embraced within the proposed sanitation district, expressed by resolution adopted by the vote of a majority of the governing body thereof.

History.

1946, p. 348; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii3.

§ 21-231.
Signatures on petition.

Every such petition shall be signed by not less than 100 qualified voters of the proposed sanitation district, including not less than 25 qualified voters of each city and county and town in whole or in part embraced within the proposed sanitation district.

History.

1946, p. 349; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii3.

§ 21-232.
Hearing and determination; ordering election.

Any person interested may answer the petition and make defense thereto and at such hearing all persons interested or desiring to controvert the allegations of the petition or question the conformity thereof to this article or object to the creation of the proposed sanitation district shall be heard. If upon such hearing the court shall not be satisfied that the allegations of the petition are sustained and that the petition conforms to the provisions of this article, it shall make an order denying and dismissing the petition. If upon such hearing the court shall be satisfied that the allegations of the petition are sustained and that the petition conforms to the provisions of this article and that all of the property in the proposed sanitation district will be benefited by the creation of the proposed sanitation district and that the public interest will be served and the public health protected by such creation, it shall make an order determining such matters and requiring the opening of a poll and the taking of the sense of the qualified voters of the proposed sanitation district in accordance with §

21-226

on the question of the creation of the proposed sanitation district. The question so submitted shall be “Do you favor the creation of the . . . . . . . . . . . . (inserting name of the proposed sanitation district stated in the said petition)?”

History.

1946, p. 349; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii3.

§ 21-233.
Order when election favors establishment.

If upon the certificate of the result of the said election made by the Secretary of the Commonwealth to such court it shall appear that a majority of the qualified voters of the proposed sanitation district voting at the election shall have voted “yes” and in favor of the creation of the proposed sanitation district, the court shall make and enter of record an order stating such result, and thereupon the territory defined in the petition, less such parts thereof as shall be excluded pursuant to the provisions of §

21-234

shall be and constitute a sanitation district for all the purposes of this chapter, known and designated by the name stated in the petition.

History.

1946, p. 349; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii3.

§ 21-234.
Exclusion from district of county, city or town voting against establishment.

If upon the certification of the results of the election provided for in §

21-233

it shall appear that a majority of the qualified voters of the portion of any county, or of any city or of any town voting on the question at the election, shall have voted “no” against the creation of the proposed sanitation district, then the territory included within the limits of such county or of such city, or of such town, shall be excluded from, and shall not constitute a part of such district.

History.

1946, p. 349; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii3.

§ 21-235.
Approval of State Health Commissioner.

The State Health Commissioner is authorized, upon being satisfied that the creation of a proposed sanitation district will provide a practical means for abating or preventing the pollution of the waters of the proposed sanitation district, to approve, as above referred to, the creation of the proposed sanitation district.

History.

1946, p. 349; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii3.

§ 21-236.
Governing bodies may adopt resolutions.

The governing body of each city and county and town is authorized, in its discretion, to adopt resolutions, as above referred to, approving and joining in the prayer of petitions for the creation of a proposed sanitation district.

History.

1946, p. 350; Michie Suppl. 1946, § 1560iii3.